Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2210
Insurance company; accounting; statement; contents.

Every company licensed to sell variable annuities in this state must file with the Director of Insurance, on or before March 1 of each year, a statement under oath for the year ending December 31, immediately preceding, for the business of its separate accounts. Such statement shall be in a form as prescribed by the director and shall include as a minimum details as to all of the income, disbursements, assets and liability items associated with the separate accounts. The director shall not issue any license to any company, either domestic or foreign, until such company has complied with the provisions of this section. For good and sufficient cause shown, the director may grant a reasonable extension of time within which such statement may be filed, in no event to exceed thirty days.

Laws 1969, c. 358, § 10, p. 1264.